Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-305.02
Prohibited acts; penalty.

Any person who willfully fails to comply with section 84-305 or 84-305.01, who otherwise willfully obstructs or hinders the conduct of an audit, examination, or related activity by the Auditor of Public Accounts, or who willfully misleads or attempts to mislead any person charged with the duty of conducting such audit, examination, or related activity shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 2021, LB369, § 2.